Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.200

Official chemists of department—Designated—Duties.

The chief chemist of the department of agriculture dairy and food laboratory and the chief chemist of the department of agriculture chemical and hop laboratory shall be the official chemists of the department of agriculture. Official chemists of the department shall provide laboratory services and analyze all substances that the director of agriculture may send to them and report to the director without unnecessary delay the results of any analysis so made. When called upon by the director, they or any of the additional chemists provided for pursuant to RCW 43.23.205 shall assist in any prosecution for the violation of any law enforced by the department.

[ 1987 c 393 s 14; 1981 c 297 s 27.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.